Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2969.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4030 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall include an
immigration status attestation on every application when hospitals
or other health care providers are making presumptive eligibility
determinations for providing Medicaid or SoonerCare. The
attestation shall be a self-certification under penalty of perjury,
subject to post-enrollment verification. No hospital or health care

Req. No. 14160 Page 1

prov ider shall be subject to civil or administrative liability for
good-faith reliance on an applicant's attestation.
B. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall, where required by
federal law, provide information to appropriate federal authority
all illegal aliens applying for Medicaid or SoonerCare.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14160 TJ 12/22/25
















Req. No. 14160 Page 2